Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.56.040

Deposits received during postponement.

Deposits received during a period of postponement and for sixty days thereafter shall be kept separate from other assets of the bank, shall not draw interest, shall not be loaned or invested except by depositing with reserve banks or investing in liquid securities approved by the director, and shall be withdrawable upon demand. If during a postponement of payments, or at the expiration thereof, the director shall take charge of the bank for liquidation, deposits made during the period of postponement shall be deemed trust funds and be repaid to the depositors forthwith.

[ 1994 c 92 s 152; 1955 c 33 s 30.56.040. Prior: 1933 c 49 s 4; RRS s 3293-4. Formerly RCW 30.56.040.]